Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
PAROLES AND PARDONS

Cross References

Administration of Hawaii paroling authority placed in
department of public safety, see §26-14.6.

§353-61 Hawaii paroling authority;
appointment; tenure; qualifications. (a) Members of the paroling authority
shall be nominated by a panel composed of the chief justice of the Hawaii
supreme court or the chief justice's designee, the director or the director's
designee, the president of the Hawaii State Bar Association or the president's
designee, a representative designated by the head of the Interfaith Alliance
Hawaii, a member from the general public to be appointed by the governor, and
the president of the Hawaii chapter of the National Association of Social
Workers or the president's designee. The panel shall submit to the governor
the names of not less than three persons, designated as the nominees, for
chairperson or as a member, for each vacancy. The requirement for nomination
by the panel established under this section shall only apply to a nominee's
nomination by the governor to an initial term on the paroling authority and not
to any subsequent consecutive term of a sitting paroling authority member or
chairperson whose initial appointment to office was made pursuant to a
nomination by the panel.

(b) The governor shall appoint, in the manner
prescribed by section 26-34, a paroling authority to be known as the Hawaii
paroling authority, to consist of five members, one of whom shall be designated
chairperson. Appointments shall be made for terms of four years, commencing
from the date of expiration of the last preceding term. Any vacancy in an
unexpired term shall be filled by appointment for the remainder of the
unexpired term. Nominees to the authority shall be selected on the basis of
their qualifications to make decisions that will be compatible with the welfare
of the community and of individual offenders, including their background and
ability for appraisal of offenders and the circumstances under which offenses
were committed. [L 1931, c 129, pt of §1; RL 1935, §6413; am L 1939, c 203, pt
of §6; RL 1945, §3914; RL 1955, §83-60; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §5; HRS §353-61;
am L 1976, c 92, §2; am L 1987, c 338, §4; gen ch 1992; am L 2004, c 24, §1; am
L 2006, c 38, §9; am L 2008, c 10, §1; am L 2011, c 16, §2; am L 2012, c 139,
§5; am L 2013, c 117, §1]

Cross References

Administrative control, see §26-35.

Sex offender treatment program, see chapter 353E.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next